Massachusetts, session 194th, H820.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 54 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 24 the 
following section:- 
Section 24A. To ensure compliance with federal and state laws concerning accessibility 
for voters with disabilities including the state secretary’s polling place accessibility regulations, 
an agent of the state secretary shall inspect, at least once every four years, each polling place 
most recently designated under section 24 and each early voting site most recently designated 
under subsection (b) of section 25B. The inspecting agent shall promptly and specifically report 
in writing to the state secretary and the city or town clerk every failure to comply with state and 
federal accessibility laws, and the responsible officials of the city or town shall take immediate 
action to ensure access for voters with disabilities and within 5 days submit to the state secretary 

of 2 11 a written plan to comply. If the city or town fails to take such immediate action or to submit a 
written plan to provide access to voters with disabilities, the state secretary may order the city or 
town to comply with the law. Not later than December 31 each year, the state secretary shall 
report in writing to the clerks of the senate and house of representatives on all activities under 
this section. The attorney general may bring a civil action in the superior court to enforce 
compliance with those accessibility laws, with a written plan, or with the state secretary’s order. 
The actions provided in this section shall not limit the availability of judicial remedies to any 
person, official, commission or board.